be_BY/be-official.aff
FLAG num
SFX 540 Y 1
SFX 540 0 цах .
SFX 1128 Y 1
SFX 1128 0 цаю .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 0 цаў .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 чную .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 чыках .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 чыкаў .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 0 каннем .
SFX 742 Y 1
SFX 742 0 чыку .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 чыкі .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 ліваннем .
SFX 3519 Y 1
SFX 3519 0 ствах .
SFX 3396 Y 1
SFX 3396 0 стваў .
SFX 3716 Y 1
SFX 3716 0 ўцам .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 ычнаю .
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 0 ычная .
SFX 4698 Y 1
SFX 4698 0 ьшчыцу .
SFX 4697 Y 1
SFX 4697 0 ьшчыцы .
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 0 касць .
SFX 2620 Y 1
SFX 2620 0 касцю .
SFX 2622 Y 1
SFX 2622 0 касці .
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 0 нічную .
SFX 3985 Y 1
SFX 3985 0 нікаваму .
SFX 3326 Y 1
SFX 3326 0 заваўся .
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 0 бім .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 кімі .
SFX 322 Y 1
SFX 322 0 авалі .
SFX 1706 Y 1
SFX 1706 0 інамі .
SFX 1651 Y 1
SFX 1651 0 ыст .
SFX 4243 Y 1
SFX 4243 0 ыся .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 ное .
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 0 ной .
SFX 1841 Y 1
SFX 1841 0 ном .
SFX 2101 Y 1
SFX 2101 0 чом .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 0 днымі .
SFX 368 Y 1
SFX 368 0 уем .
SFX 1061 Y 1
SFX 1061 0 ены .
SFX 4324 Y 1
SFX 4324 0 дзяцца .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 0 лінам .
SFX 1630 Y 1
SFX 1630 0 зіліся .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 чанымі .
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 0 альніках .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 0 альнікаў .
SFX 4229 Y 1
SFX 4229 0 анту .
SFX 4228 Y 1
SFX 4228 0 анты .
SFX 2508 Y 1
SFX 2508 0 ьскімі .
SFX 2201 Y 1
SFX 2201 0 сцкімі .
SFX 1838 Y 1
SFX 1838 0 рках .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 ркаю .
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 0 анах .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 анаю .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 аная .
SFX 3482 Y 1
SFX 3482 0 анаў .
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 0 авалася .
SFX 4820 Y 1
SFX 4820 0 іроўка .
SFX 1273 Y 1
SFX 1273 0 аўскіх .
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 0 аўскія .
SFX 3668 Y 1
SFX 3668 0 ьна .
SFX 2614 Y 1
SFX 2614 0 хаем .
SFX 3817 Y 1
SFX 3817 0 ыстае .
SFX 3816 Y 1
SFX 3816 0 ыстай .
SFX 2915 Y 1
SFX 2915 0 ыстак .
SFX 1650 Y 1
SFX 1650 0 ыстам .
SFX 2311 Y 1
SFX 2311 0 чыцца .
SFX 3337 Y 1
SFX 3337 0 заванае .
SFX 3336 Y 1
SFX 3336 0 заванай .
SFX 2546 Y 1
SFX 2546 0 шаных .
SFX 2545 Y 1
SFX 2545 0 шаныя .
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 0 стым .
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 0 альнік .
SFX 1767 Y 1
SFX 1767 0 ою .
SFX 133 Y 1
SFX 133 0 оў .
SFX 1276 Y 1
SFX 1276 0 аўскі .
SFX 530 Y 1
SFX 530 0 овае .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 овай .
SFX 1920 Y 1
SFX 1920 0 овак .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 туеш .
SFX 358 Y 1
SFX 358 0 кіх .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 кія .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 леную .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 стаму .
SFX 856 Y 1
SFX 856 0 стамі .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 0 авік .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 ізаваным .
SFX 4032 Y 1
SFX 4032 0 швала .
SFX 3174 Y 1
SFX 3174 0 олагамі .
SFX 2363 Y 1
SFX 2363 0 жных .
SFX 2362 Y 1
SFX 2362 0 жныя .
SFX 3226 Y 1
SFX 3226 0 джанаму .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 0 ніцкую .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 йным .
SFX 3072 Y 1
SFX 3072 0 ьваецеся .
SFX 3056 Y 1
SFX 3056 0 зуйце .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 ляешся .
SFX 4368 Y 1
SFX 4368 0 эла .
SFX 4111 Y 1
SFX 4111 0 аўцам .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 ачных .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 ачныя .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 шыся .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 ковым .
SFX 3876 Y 1
SFX 3876 0 ранага .
SFX 1763 Y 1
SFX 1763 0 снаю .
SFX 1576 Y 1
SFX 1576 0 сная .
SFX 4198 Y 1
SFX 4198 0 квала .
SFX 3779 Y 1
SFX 3779 0 гах .
SFX 2225 Y 1
SFX 2225 0 гаю .
SFX 2974 Y 1
SFX 2974 0 гаў .
SFX 1848 Y 1
SFX 1848 0 арнымі .
SFX 2827 Y 1
SFX 2827 0 жваюцца .
SFX 4434 Y 1
SFX 4434 0 оўшчыцу .
SFX 4433 Y 1
SFX 4433 0 оўшчыцы .
SFX 4091 Y 1
SFX 4091 0 ізавалася .
SFX 2380 Y 1
SFX 2380 0 ьнасць .
SFX 2379 Y 1
SFX 2379 0 ьнасцю .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 ьнасці .
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 0 метр .
SFX 3717 Y 1
SFX 3717 0 ўца .
SFX 4681 Y 1
SFX 4681 0 даем .
SFX 1794 Y 1
SFX 1794 0 ьваю .
SFX 1795 Y 1
SFX 1795 0 ьваў .
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 0 ламу .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 0 ламі .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 атым .
SFX 1136 Y 1
SFX 1136 0 зіла .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 джаную .
SFX 3788 Y 1
SFX 3788 0 ача .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 аем .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 чных .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 чныя .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 ілі .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 0 іках .
SFX 3900 Y 1
SFX 3900 0 ікаю .
SFX 4749 Y 1
SFX 4749 0 паную .
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 0 ікаў .
SFX 4507 Y 1
SFX 4507 0 астым .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 шчыка .
SFX 3988 Y 1
SFX 3988 0 нікавага .
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 0 оўках .
SFX 1058 Y 1
SFX 1058 0 оўкаю .
SFX 4603 Y 1
SFX 4603 0 нічных .
SFX 4602 Y 1
SFX 4602 0 нічныя .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 раючыся .
SFX 1384 Y 1
SFX 1384 0 ерах .
SFX 1419 Y 1
SFX 1419 0 ераў .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 ўскую .
SFX 3647 Y 1
SFX 3647 0 дзіліся .
SFX 4885 Y 1
SFX 4885 0 чэнне .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 еце .
SFX 4319 Y 1
SFX 4319 0 еда .
SFX 4271 Y 1
SFX 4271 0 уна .
SFX 3967 Y 1
SFX 3967 0 уне .
SFX 3862 Y 1
SFX 3862 0 ствавала .
SFX 553 Y 1
SFX 553 0 ніцу .
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 0 ніцы .
SFX 2690 Y 1
SFX 2690 0 ніць .
SFX 3646 Y 1
SFX 3646 0 дзіўся .
SFX 4503 Y 1
SFX 4503 0 вальшчыка .
SFX 4273 Y 1
SFX 4273 0 таеш .
SFX 860 Y 1
SFX 860 0 падобным .
SFX 3785 Y 1
SFX 3785 0 ачах .
SFX 3626 Y 1
SFX 3626 0 нтах .
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 0 нтаў .
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 чнымі .
SFX 722 Y 1
SFX 722 0 айся .
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 0 каўся .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 каліся .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 авымі .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 арскую .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 ча .
SFX 1603 Y 1
SFX 1603 0 ліваліся .
SFX 4846 Y 1
SFX 4846 0 вальнік .
SFX 2555 Y 1
SFX 2555 0 шанае .
SFX 2554 Y 1
SFX 2554 0 шанай .
SFX 4320 Y 1
SFX 4320 0 ед .
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 0 ее .
SFX 2628 Y 1
SFX 2628 0 ей .
SFX 3343 Y 1
SFX 3343 0 ек .
SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 ем .
SFX 2061 Y 1
SFX 2061 0 зацыяй .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 стага .
SFX 3755 Y 1
SFX 3755 0 кла .
SFX 450 Y 1
SFX 450 0 леных .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 леныя .
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 0 цыйны .
SFX 4826 Y 1
SFX 4826 0 жайце .
SFX 4019 Y 1
SFX 4019 0 аламі .
SFX 4371 Y 1
SFX 4371 0 ьнік .
SFX 762 Y 1
SFX 762 0 стую .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 0 ўнымі .
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 0 сцкі .
SFX 1850 Y 1
SFX 1850 0 арны .
SFX 3229 Y 1
SFX 3229 0 джанага .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 0 йнымі .
SFX 1563 Y 1
SFX 1563 0 цкае .
SFX 1562 Y 1
SFX 1562 0 цкай .
SFX 2404 Y 1
SFX 2404 0 жнае .
SFX 2403 Y 1
SFX 2403 0 жнай .
SFX 2126 Y 1
SFX 2126 0 чвайце .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 ізаваную .
SFX 2402 Y 1
SFX 2402 0 жнаму .
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 0 чванне .
SFX 3775 Y 1
SFX 3775 0 джваю .
SFX 3651 Y 1
SFX 3651 0 джваў .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 вымі .
SFX 1343 Y 1
SFX 1343 0 нецца .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 йную .
SFX 787 Y 1
SFX 787 0 ачнае .
SFX 786 Y 1
SFX 786 0 ачнай .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 завала .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 лым .
SFX 4983 Y 1
SFX 4983 0 льскім .
SFX 1809 Y 1
SFX 1809 0 раваным .
SFX 3907 Y 1
SFX 3907 0 зае .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 зай .
SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 0 зам .
SFX 2093 Y 1
SFX 2093 0 лкамі .
SFX 1423 Y 1
SFX 1423 0 нулася .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 нічаеце .
SFX 4909 Y 1
SFX 4909 0 чаты .
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 лага .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 ковую .
SFX 3219 Y 1
SFX 3219 0 джаных .
SFX 3218 Y 1
SFX 3218 0 джаныя .
SFX 4230 Y 1
SFX 4230 0 антах .
SFX 4231 Y 1
SFX 4231 0 антаў .
SFX 3461 Y 1
SFX 3461 0 іруюцца .
SFX 2565 Y 1
SFX 2565 0 рыла .
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 0 жвалася .
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 0 раючы .
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 0 лагічным .
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 0 атую .
SFX 289 Y 1
SFX 289 0 чнае .
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 0 чнай .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 ана .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 ане .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 ападобным .
SFX 4950 Y 1
SFX 4950 0 паных .
SFX 4949 Y 1
SFX 4949 0 паныя .
SFX 3186 Y 1
SFX 3186 0 нскі .
SFX 3094 Y 1
SFX 3094 0 тарах .
SFX 3159 Y 1
SFX 3159 0 тараў .
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 0 джвала .
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 0 ляем .
SFX 2489 Y 1
SFX 2489 0 льніка .
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 0 джу .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 ованымі .
SFX 4784 Y 1
SFX 4784 0 нічнае .
SFX 4783 Y 1
SFX 4783 0 нічнай .
SFX 4248 Y 1
SFX 4248 0 шваючы .
SFX 4353 Y 1
SFX 4353 0 астую .
SFX 3714 Y 1
SFX 3714 0 ўцах .
SFX 3965 Y 1
SFX 3965 0 ўцаў .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 зуем .
SFX 4348 Y 1
SFX 4348 0 біш .
SFX 3347 Y 1
SFX 3347 0 біў .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 ваючы .
SFX 4014 Y 1
SFX 4014 0 атэрапію .
SFX 4013 Y 1
SFX 4013 0 атэрапія .
SFX 4015 Y 1
SFX 4015 0 атэрапіі .
SFX 4765 Y 1
SFX 4765 0 ометра .
SFX 3733 Y 1
SFX 3733 0 раным .
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 0 ною .
SFX 2118 Y 1
SFX 2118 0 ноў .
SFX 3515 Y 1
SFX 3515 0 учы .
SFX 2995 Y 1
SFX 2995 0 шчыцкую .
SFX 3150 Y 1
SFX 3150 0 чоў .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 біўшы .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 уеш .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 ованым .
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 іцца .
SFX 2301 Y 1
SFX 2301 0 жваеце .
SFX 4156 Y 1
SFX 4156 0 ўное .
SFX 4155 Y 1
SFX 4155 0 ўной .
SFX 1162 Y 1
SFX 1162 0 каюць .
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 0 падобную .
SFX 890 Y 1
SFX 890 0 падобны .
SFX 3662 Y 1
SFX 3662 0 яе .
SFX 832 Y 1
SFX 832 0 яй .
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 0 ям .
SFX 4310 Y 1
SFX 4310 0 ловы .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 ачкамі .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 на .
SFX 4073 Y 1
SFX 4073 0 нг .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 не .
SFX 4688 Y 1
SFX 4688 0 будаваннем .
SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 0 рства .
SFX 4579 Y 1
SFX 4579 0 рстве .
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 0 іроўку .
SFX 4817 Y 1
SFX 4817 0 іроўкі .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 шцы .
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 0 ленае .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 0 ленай .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 ьны .
SFX 2658 Y 1
SFX 2658 0 хаеш .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 сіце .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 ыстах .
SFX 3814 Y 1
SFX 3814 0 ыстаю .
SFX 3813 Y 1
SFX 3813 0 ыстая .
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 0 ыстаў .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 заванаю .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 заваная .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 стых .
SFX 767 Y 1
SFX 767 0 стыя .
SFX 3116 Y 1
SFX 3116 0 кніце .
SFX 523 Y 1
SFX 523 0 оваю .
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 0 овая .
SFX 2405 Y 1
SFX 2405 0 жнага .
SFX 3929 Y 1
SFX 3929 0 аўкамі .
SFX 1534 Y 1
SFX 1534 0 ніцкае .
SFX 1533 Y 1
SFX 1533 0 ніцкай .
SFX 3760 Y 1
SFX 3760 0 ізаваных .
SFX 3759 Y 1
SFX 3759 0 ізаваныя .
SFX 3284 Y 1
SFX 3284 0 таваным .
SFX 3362 Y 1
SFX 3362 0 ыўны .
SFX 2750 Y 1
SFX 2750 0 уйцеся .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 швалі .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 ста .
SFX 2316 Y 1
SFX 2316 0 туеце .
SFX 2884 Y 1
SFX 2884 0 йных .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 0 йныя .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 сак .
SFX 1235 Y 1
SFX 1235 0 сам .
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 ьнымі .
SFX 2842 Y 1
SFX 2842 0 алагічным .
SFX 3079 Y 1
SFX 3079 0 ызацыю .
SFX 3078 Y 1
SFX 3078 0 ызацыя .
SFX 3080 Y 1
SFX 3080 0 ызацыі .
SFX 4367 Y 1
SFX 4367 0 элі .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 ючыся .
SFX 3729 Y 1
SFX 3729 0 рылася .
SFX 4109 Y 1
SFX 4109 0 аўцах .
SFX 4351 Y 1
SFX 4351 0 аўцаў .
SFX 4951 Y 1
SFX 4951 0 панымі .
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 0 лую .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 ковых .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 ковыя .
SFX 1164 Y 1
SFX 1164 0 уцца .
SFX 1811 Y 1
SFX 1811 0 раваную .
SFX 980 Y 1
SFX 980 0 люся .
SFX 4360 Y 1
SFX 4360 0 аваўшыся .
SFX 1752 Y 1
SFX 1752 0 зіцеся .
SFX 4197 Y 1
SFX 4197 0 квалі .
SFX 3228 Y 1
SFX 3228 0 джанае .
SFX 3227 Y 1
SFX 3227 0 джанай .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 целем .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 ўцу .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 ўцы .
SFX 4098 Y 1
SFX 4098 0 даеш .
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 0 заем .
SFX 1707 Y 1
SFX 1707 0 іка .
SFX 2411 Y 1
SFX 2411 0 атых .
SFX 2410 Y 1
SFX 2410 0 атыя .
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 0 зілі .
SFX 4957 Y 1
SFX 4957 0 панае .
SFX 4956 Y 1
SFX 4956 0 панай .
SFX 4370 Y 1
SFX 4370 0 ьнікам .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 аўшы .
SFX 3750 Y 1
SFX 3750 0 ліваюся .
SFX 2022 Y 1
SFX 2022 0 ачу .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 ачы .
SFX 3442 Y 1
SFX 3442 0 лагічную .
SFX 4072 Y 1
SFX 4072 0 нгам .
SFX 205 Y 1
SFX 205 0 аеш .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 ападобную .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 0 альніка .
SFX 538 Y 1
SFX 538 0 льным .
SFX 4505 Y 1
SFX 4505 0 астых .
SFX 4352 Y 1
SFX 4352 0 астыя .
SFX 1291 Y 1
SFX 1291 0 ўскае .
SFX 1290 Y 1
SFX 1290 0 ўскай .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 шчыку .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 шчыкі .
SFX 4449 Y 1
SFX 4449 0 нцам .
SFX 3958 Y 1
SFX 3958 0 цілася .
SFX 4070 Y 1
SFX 4070 0 нее .
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 0 ней .
SFX 354 Y 1
SFX 354 0 нем .
SFX 4882 Y 1
SFX 4882 0 чэнню .
SFX 4881 Y 1
SFX 4881 0 чэння .
SFX 4883 Y 1
SFX 4883 0 чэнні .
SFX 2505 Y 1
SFX 2505 0 ьскую .
SFX 2710 Y 1
SFX 2710 0 ець .
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 0 анасць .
